chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е 
 %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0 
 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0
;
Sets 

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ;

FrontVow = ӗ э и ӳ ; 

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ; 

Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ; 
